Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.484

Tribal opioid prevention and treatment account.

The tribal opioid prevention and treatment account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the transfer directed in RCW 43.79.483(3) must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for addressing the impact of the opioid epidemic in tribal communities, including: (1) Prevention and recovery services; (2) treatment programs including medication-assisted treatment; (3) peer services; (4) awareness campaigns and education; and (5) support for first responders.

[ 2024 c 210 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 210: "(1) Except for section 5 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

(2) Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2028." [ 2024 c 210 s 7.]

Findings—Intent—2024 c 210: "The legislature finds that American Indians and Alaska Natives are affected disproportionately by the opioid crisis and that opioid overdose rates are higher for American Indians and Alaska Natives than in any other category by race and ethnicity. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to prioritize moneys received from opioid settlements to address specific impacts in tribal communities through the creation of a dedicated tribal opioid prevention and treatment account." [ 2024 c 210 s 1.]